District of Columbia statutes.
9-103.06

Inapplicability of §§ 9-103.01 to 9-103.05 to Interstate System.

None of the provisions of §§ 9-103.01 to 9-103.05 shall apply to any segment of the Interstate System within the District of Columbia.

Aug. 13, 1973, 87 Stat. 268, Pub. L. 93-87, title I, § 135
1981 Ed., § 7-112.
1973 Ed., § 7-112a.
“ Section 9-103.05”, referred to in the heading and text, was repealed by § 711 of D.C. Law 4-201, effective March 10, 1983.